fr: Norme de connexion en planche à voile: Platine supérieure à 4 boulons; Boîtier Deep Tuttle; Euro Pin; Rails de foil 160×90; Rails de foil 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Boîtier Tuttle; U-Pin; US Cup; Autre
ja: ウィンドサーフィン接続規格: 4ボルトトッププレート; Deep Tuttle Box; ユーロピン; フォイルトラック 160×90; フォイルトラック 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle Box; Uピン; USカップ; その他
sv: Standard för vindsurfingkoppling: Topplatta (4 bultar); Deep Tuttle box; Euro-pin; Foil Track 160×90; Foil Track 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle box; U-pin; US Cup; Övrigt
zh-TW: 風浪板連接標準: 四螺栓頂板; 深 Tuttle 槽; 歐洲插銷 (Euro Pin); 水翼軌道 160×90; 水翼軌道 165×90; 迷你 Tuttle; Power 槽 (Powerbox); Tuttle 槽; U 型插銷; US 萬向座; 其他
pl: Standard połączenia windsurfingowego: Górna płyta na 4 śruby; Deep Tuttle Box; Euro Pin; Szyna Foil Track 160×90; Szyna Foil Track 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle Box; U-Pin; US Cup; Inny
pt-BR: Windsurf padrão de conexão: Placa superior com 4 parafusos; Caixa Deep Tuttle; Euro Pin; Trilho de foil 160×90; Trilho de foil 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Caixa Tuttle; U-Pin; US Cup; Outro
sl-SI: Standardna povezava za jadranje na deski: Zgornja plošča s 4 vijaki; Deep Tuttle Box; Euro Pin; Foil Track 160 × 90; Foil Track 165 × 90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle Box; U-Pin; US Cup; Drugo
th: มาตรฐานการเชื่อมต่อวินด์เซิร์ฟ: เพลตด้านบนแบบน็อต 4 ตัว; Deep Tuttle Box; Euro Pin; แทร็คฟอยล์ 160×90; แทร็คฟอยล์ 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle Box; U-Pin; US Cup; อื่นๆ
tr: Rüzgar sörfü bağlantı standardı: 4 Cıvatalı Üst Plaka; Derin Tuttle Kutusu; Euro Pin; Foil Rayı 160×90; Foil Rayı 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle Kutusu; U-Pin; US Cup; Diğer
es: Estándar de conexión para windsurf: Placa superior de 4 tornillos; Caja Deep Tuttle; Euro Pin; Riel de foil de 160×90; Riel de foil de 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Caja Tuttle; U-Pin; Copa US; Otro
vi: Tiêu chuẩn kết nối lướt ván buồm: Ngàm phẳng 4 ốc; Hộp Deep Tuttle; Euro Pin; Foil Track 160×90; Foil Track 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle Box; U-Pin; US Cup; Khác
da: Tilslutningsstandard for windsurfing: 4-Bolt Top Plate; Deep Tuttle Box; Euro Pin; Foil Track 160×90; Foil Track 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle Box; U-Pin; US Cup; Andet
pt-PT: Norma de ligação de windsurf: Placa superior com 4 parafusos; Caixa Deep Tuttle; Euro Pin; Calha foil 160×90; Calha foil 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Caixa Tuttle; Pino em U; Copo US; Outro
lt-LT: Burlenčių jungties standartas: 4 varžtų viršutinė plokštė; Deep Tuttle Box; Euro Pin; Foil Track 160×90; Foil Track 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle Box; U-Pin; US Cup; Kita
fi: Purjelautaliitännät, vakio: 4-pulttinen ylälevy; Deep Tuttle -laatikko; Euro-tappi; Foil Track 160 × 90; Foil Track 165 × 90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle-laatikko; U-tappi; US Cup; Muu
nb: Standard for tilkobling til windsurfing: Topplate med 4 bolter; Deep Tuttle Box; Euro-pinne; Foilspor 160x90; Foilspor 165x90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle Box; U-pinne; US Cup; Annet
hu: Szörf kapcsolat szabvány: 4 csavaros fedőlemez; Deep Tuttle Box; Euro Pin; Foil sín 160×90; Foil sín 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle Box; U-Pin; US Cup; Egyéb
hr-HR: Standardna veza za jedrenje na dasci: Gornja ploča s 4 vijka; Deep Tuttle Box; Euro Pin; Foil Track 160 × 90; Foil Track 165 × 90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle Box; U-Pin; US Cup; Ostalo
en: Windsurfing connection standard: 4-Bolt Top Plate; Deep Tuttle Box; Euro Pin; Foil Track 160×90; Foil Track 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle Box; U-Pin; US Cup; Other
el: Πρότυπο σύνδεσης για windsurf: Πάνω πλάκα 4 βιδών; Deep Tuttle Box; Euro Pin; Ράγα foil 160×90; Ράγα foil 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle Box; U-Pin; US Cup; Άλλο
cs: Standard upevnění k windsurfingu: Vrchní deska se 4 šrouby; Deep Tuttle Box; Euro Pin; Foilová drážka 160×90; Foilová drážka 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle Box; U-Pin; US Cup; Jiné
nl: Windsurf verbindingsstandaard: 4-bout-bovenplaat; Deep Tuttle-box; Euro-pin; Foil track 160×90; Foil track 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle-box; U-pin; US Cup; Overige
it: Standard di collegamento windsurf: Piastra superiore a 4 bulloni; Deep Tuttle Box; Euro Pin; Foil Track 160×90; Foil Track 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle Box; U-Pin; US Cup; Altro
ru: Стандарт крепления виндсерфинга: 4-Bolt Top Plate; Deep Tuttle Box; Euro Pin; Foil Track 160×90; Foil Track 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle Box; U-Pin; US Cup; Другое
zh-CN: 帆板连接标准: 4 螺栓顶板; 深 Tuttle 盒; 欧式插销; 水翼轨道 160×90; 水翼轨道 165×90; 迷你 Tuttle; Power 盒; Tuttle 盒; U 型销; 美式杯形; 其他
ko: 윈드서핑 연결 표준: 4-볼트 탑 플레이트; 딥 터틀 박스; 유로 핀; 포일 트랙 160×90; 포일 트랙 165×90; 미니 터틀; 파워박스; 터틀 박스; U-핀; US 컵; 기타
sk-SK: Štandardné pripojenie pre windsurfing: Vrchná doska so 4 skrutkami; Deep Tuttle Box; Euro Pin; Foil Track 160 × 90; Foil Track 165 × 90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle Box; U-Pin; US Cup; Iné
de: Windsurf-Verbindungsstandard: 4-Bolt Top Plate; Deep-Tuttle-Box; Euro-Pin; Foil-Track 160×90; Foil-Track 165×90; Mini-Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle-Box; U-Pin; US-Cup; Sonstige
ro-RO: Standardul de conectare pentru windsurf: Placă superioară cu 4 șuruburi; Deep Tuttle Box; Euro Pin; Foil Track 160×90; Foil Track 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle Box; U-Pin; US Cup; Altele
bg-BG: Стандарт за връзка за уиндсърф: Горна плоча с 4 болта; Deep Tuttle Box; Euro Pin; Foil Track 160×90; Foil Track 165×90; Mini Tuttle; Powerbox; Tuttle Box; U-Pin; US Cup; Друго